Tennessee, session 114, SB2088.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 38-7-109(c)(1)(A), is amended by
deleting "that resulted in the deaths of four (4) or more individuals".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 38-7-109(c)(5), is amended by
adding the following language as a new, appropriately designated subdivision:
( ) "Mass shooting" means:
(i) A shooting resulting in four (4) or more individuals sustaining an injury;
or
(ii) A shooting in which a reasonable person would conclude that the
decedent attempted to kill four (4) or more individuals;
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 40, Chapter 7, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Health science center" has the same meaning as defined in § 38-7-
109;
(2) "Hospital" has the same meaning as defined in § 68-11-201;
(3) "Mass shooting" means:
(A) A shooting resulting in four (4) or more individuals sustaining
an injury; or
SB2088
010155
- 1 -

(B) A shooting in which a reasonable person would conclude that
a person attempted to kill four (4) or more individuals;
(4) "Psychotropic drug" has the same meaning as defined in § 38-7-109;
and
(5) "Qualified practitioner" means:
(A) A physician;
(B) A registered nurse;
(C) A licensed practical nurse;
(D) A clinical laboratory technician;
(E) A technologist;
(F) A trained phlebotomist who is operating under a hospital
protocol, has completed phlebotomy training through an educational
entity providing such training, or has been properly trained by a current or
former employer to draw blood; or
(G) A physician assistant.
(b) A law enforcement officer who has probable cause to believe that a person
has committed a mass shooting shall cause to be administered by a qualified practitioner
at a hospital a blood or urine test for the purpose of determining the presence of any
drugs, including therapeutic levels of psychotropic drugs.
(c)
(1) A qualified practitioner shall:
(A) Procure the blood or urine sample from a person as soon as
practicable as long as the person's life is not in jeopardy; and
(B) Test the person's blood or urine for the presence of any
drugs, including therapeutic levels of psychotropic drugs.
- 2 - 010155

(2) A qualified practitioner must be considered to be acting in good faith
once presented with a search warrant or any other court order authorizing the
procurement of a blood or urine sample and such sample is drawn as soon as
practicable.
(3) A qualified practitioner may use all reasonable force to obtain the
blood or urine sample from the person.
(4) A qualified practitioner or hospital shall not incur civil or criminal
liability as a result of procuring a blood or urine sample pursuant to this section,
except in a case of negligence.
(d)
(1) The hospital where the blood or urine sample was procured and
tested shall send to the health science center:
(A) The procured blood or urine sample, as described in
subdivision (c)(1)(A); and
(B) The results of the drug test, as described in subdivision
(c)(1)(B).
(2) The hospital shall not disclose any identifying information, including
the person's name or social security number.
(e)
(1) The health science center shall study the drug interactions between
the psychotropic drugs and any other drugs that were present in the person's
blood or urine.
(2) The health science center shall include any data collected pursuant to
this section to the quarterly reports submitted to the chief clerks of each house of
the general assembly in accordance with § 38-7-109.
- 3 - 010155

SECTION 4. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to mass shootings occurring on or after that date.
- 4 - 010155